sv: Glassformat: Pinne; Strut; Bägare; Glasstårta; Mochi; Pint; Quart; Sandwich; Mjukglassmix; Låda; Övrigt
lt-LT: Ledų formatas: Ledai ant pagaliuko; Ragelis; Indelis; Ledų tortas; Moči; Pinta; Kvorta; Ledų sumuštinis; Minkštų ledų mišinys; Dėžutė; Kita
da: Isformat: Bar; Vaffel; Bæger; Iskage; Mochi; Pint; Quart; Issandwich; Softicemix; Bøtte; Andet
cs: Formát zmrzliny: Nanuk; Kornout; Kelímek; Zmrzlinový dort; Mochi; Pinta; Kvarta; Sendvič; Směs na točenou zmrzlinu; Vanička; Ostatní
hr-HR: Format sladoleda: Štapić; Kornet; Čašica; Sladoledna torta; Mochi; Pinta; Kvart; Sendvič; Smjesa za točeni sladoled; Posuda; Ostalo
el: Μορφή παγωτού: Ξυλάκι; Χωνάκι; Κυπελάκι; Παγωτό τούρτα; Μότσι; Pint; Quart; Παγωτό σάντουιτς; Μείγμα για παγωτό μηχανής; Κύπελλο (tub); Άλλο
ko: 아이스크림 형태: 바; 콘; 컵; 아이스크림 케이크; 모찌; 파인트; 쿼트; 샌드위치; 소프트아이스크림 믹스; 터브; 기타
de: Eiscremeformat: Eis am Stiel; Waffelhörnchen; Becher; Eistorte; Mochi; Pint; Quart; Eissandwich; Softeis-Mix; Wanne; Sonstiges
es: Formato de helado: Barra; Cono; Taza; Pastel helado; Mochi; Pinta; Cuarto de galón; Sándwich; Mezcla de helado suave; Tarrina; Otro
zh-TW: 冰淇淋形式: 冰棒; 甜筒; 杯裝; 冰淇淋蛋糕; 麻糬; 品脫; 夸脫; 冰淇淋三明治; 霜淇淋原料; 桶裝; 其他
nl: IJs formaat: IJsreep; IJshoorn; Beker; IJstaart; Mochi; Pint; Quart; IJssandwich; Softijsmix; Bak; Overig
en: Ice cream format: Bar; Cone; Cup; Ice cream cake; Mochi; Pint; Quart; Sandwich; Soft serve mix; Tub; Other
pl: Format lodów: Na patyku; W rożku; W kubku; Tort lodowy; Mochi; Kubełek (ok. 500 ml); Kubełek (ok. 1 l); Kanapka lodowa; Mieszanka do lodów włoskich; Pojemnik; Inne
ru: Формат мороженого: Эскимо; Рожок; Стаканчик; Торт-мороженое; Моти; Пинта; Кварта; Сэндвич; Смесь для мягкого мороженого; Ванночка; Другое
hu: Fagylalt formátuma: Jégkrém (pálcikás); Tölcséres; Poharas; Fagylalttorta; Mochi; Pint (kb. 500 ml); Quart (kb. 1 liter); Jégkrémszendvics; Lágyfagylalt-keverék; Tégelyes; Egyéb
pt-BR: Sorvete formato: Barra; Casquinha; Copo; Bolo de sorvete; Mochi; Pint; Quart; Sanduíche de sorvete; Mistura para sorvete expresso; Pote; Outro
zh-CN: 冰淇淋形态: 冰淇淋条; 甜筒; 杯装; 冰淇淋蛋糕; 麻薯; 品脱装; 夸脱装; 三明治; 软冰淇淋粉; 桶装; 其他
th: รูปแบบไอศกรีม: แท่ง; โคน; ถ้วย; เค้กไอศกรีม; โมจิ; ไพนต์; ควอร์ต; แซนด์วิช; ผงทำซอฟต์เสิร์ฟ; กล่อง; อื่นๆ
nb: Iskremformat: Ispinne; Kjeks; Beger; Iskake; Mochi; Pint; Quart; Sandwich; Softis-miks; Boks; Annet
fi: Jäätelön muoto: Puikko; Tuutti; Pikari; Jäätelökakku; Mochi; Pint; Quart; Jäätelövoileipä; Pehmeä jäätelöseos; Purkki; Muu
pt-PT: Formato de gelado: Barra; Cone; Copo; Bolo de gelado; Mochi; Pint; Quart; Sanduíche; Mistura de gelado soft; Tarrina; Outro
fr: Format de crème glacée: Bâtonnet; Cône; Pot; Gâteau glacé; Mochi; Pinte; Quart; Sandwich; Mélange pour glace à l’italienne; Bac; Autre
vi: Định dạng kem: Kem que; Ốc quế; Ly; Bánh kem lạnh; Mochi; Pint; Quart; Sandwich kem; Bột kem tươi; Hộp (Tub); Khác
sl-SI: Oblika sladoleda: Lučka; Kornet; Lonček; Sladoledna torta; Mochi; Pinta; Kvart; Sladoledni sendvič; Mešanica za točeni sladoled; Banjica; Drugo
bg-BG: Формат на сладоледа: На клечка; Фунийка; Чашка; Сладоледена торта; Мочи; Пинта; Кварта; Сандвич; Микс за мек сладолед; Кутия; Други
it: Formato del gelato: Stecco; Cono; Coppetta; Torta gelato; Mochi; Pinta; Litro; Biscotto; Preparato per gelato soft; Vaschetta; Altro
sk-SK: Formát zmrzliny: Nanuk; Kornútok; Téglik; Zmrzlinová torta; Mochi; Pinta; Kvarta; Sendvič; Zmes na točenú zmrzlinu; Vanička; Iné
ro-RO: Formatul înghețatei: Baton; Cornet; Pahar; Tort de înghețată; Mochi; Pint; Quart; Sandviș; Mix pentru înghețată la aparat; Cutie; Altele
ja: アイスクリームの形: バー; コーン; カップ; アイスクリームケーキ; もちアイス; パイント; クォート; サンドイッチ; ソフトクリームミックス; タブ; その他
tr: Dondurma formu: Çubuk; Külah; Kap; Dondurmalı pasta; Mochi; Pint; Quart; Sandviç; Yumuşak dondurma karışımı; Kova; Diğer